Nebraska, session 109, LB18.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB18 LB18
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 86-1236, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1236 (1) This section applies only to activities of a wireless
provider within the right-of-way to deploy small wireless facilities and
associated utility poles.
(2) An authority shall not enter into an exclusive arrangement with
any person for use of the right-of-way.
(3) Subject to the exception in subsection (7) of section 86-1237,
an authority may only charge a wireless provider on a nondiscriminatory
basis the rate or fee provided in section 86-1239 for the use of any
right-of-way for the collocation of small wireless facilities or the
installation, maintenance, modification, operation, or replacement of a
utility pole in the right-of-way if the authority charges other entities
for the use of the right-of-way. An authority may, on a nondiscriminatory
basis, refrain from charging any rate to a wireless provider for the use
of the right-of-way.
(4) Except as provided in this section, a wireless provider shall
have the right, as a permitted use not subject to zoning review or
approval, to collocate small wireless facilities and install, maintain,
modify, operate, and replace utility poles along, across, upon, and under
the right-of-way so long as such facilities and poles do not obstruct or
hinder the usual travel or public safety on such right-of-way or obstruct
the legal use of such right-of-way by utilities or the safe operation of
their systems or provision of service.
(5)(a) Any new or modified utility pole installed in a right-of-way
shall not exceed the greater of (i) five feet in height above the tallest
existing utility pole in place as of September 1, 2019, located within
five hundred feet of the new utility pole in the same right-of-way or
(ii) fifty feet above ground level.
(b) New small wireless facilities in a right-of-way shall not extend
more than the greater of (i) fifty feet in height, including antenna, or
-2-

LB18 LB18
2025 2025
(ii) more than five feet above an existing utility pole in place as of
September 1, 2019, and located within five hundred feet in the same
right-of-way.
(c) An authority shall have the right, at its sole discretion and
subject to applicable nondiscriminatory regulations, to consider and
approve an application to install a utility pole or wireless support
structure that exceeds the height limits in this subsection for the right
to collocate a small wireless facility and install, maintain, modify,
operate, and replace a utility pole that exceeds such height limits
along, across, upon, and under a right-of-way.
(6) An applicant may request approval from an authority, as part of
the application process, to replace a decorative pole when necessary to
collocate a small wireless facility. Any replacement decorative pole
shall conform to the nondiscriminatory design aesthetics of the
decorative pole being replaced.
(7) Except for facilities excluded from evaluation for effects on
historic properties under 47 C.F.R. 1.1307(a)(4), as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2019, an authority shall have the right to require
design or concealment measures in a historic district established prior
to January 1, 2019. Such design or concealment measures shall be
objective and directed to avoid or remedy the intangible public harm of
unsightly or out-of-character wireless facilities deployed at the
proposed location within the authority's jurisdiction. Any such design or
concealment measures shall be reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and
published in advance, and shall not be considered a part of the small
wireless facility for purposes of the size restrictions of a small
wireless facility.
(8) An authority may require a wireless provider to repair all
damage to a right-of-way directly caused by the activities of the
wireless provider in the right-of-way and return the right-of-way to
equal or better condition to that before the damage occurred pursuant to
-3-

LB18 LB18
2025 2025
the competitively neutral and reasonable requirements and specifications
of the authority. If the applicant fails to make the repairs that are
reasonably required by the authority within fourteen days after written
notice, the authority may undertake such repairs and charge the wireless
provider the reasonable, documented cost of such repairs. An authority
shall grant an extension of up to ten days to complete such repairs if
the wireless provider requests such extension within the original
fourteen-day period. In the event of immediate threat to life, safety, or
to prevent serious injury, the authority may immediately undertake to
restore the site and then notify the applicant and charge the applicant
for all reasonable restoration costs.
(9)(a) An authority shall, prior to installation of any new or
modified utility pole in a right-of-way, determine whether such
installation:
(i) Complies with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990 and the federal regulations adopted in response to such act, as such
act and regulations existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) Does not obstruct or hinder usual travel or public safety in or
on such right-of-way; and
(iii) Does not obstruct the legal use of such right-of-way by any
utility or impede the safe operation of such utility's system or
provision of its service.
(b) If an authority determines that such installation does not
comply with the criteria in subdivision (a) of this subsection, the
authority shall not permit such installation.
Sec. 2. Original section 86-1236, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-